New Jersey, session 221, A808.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 5 of P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.52) is amended to read as follows: 5.    a.   A contractor shall register in writing with the department on a form provided by the commissioner. The form shall require the following information: (1)   The name, principal business address and telephone number of the contractor; (2)   Whether the contractor is a corporation, partnership, sole proprietorship, or other form of business entity; (3)   If the contractor's principal business address is not within the State, the name and address of the contractor's custodian of records and agent for service of process in this State; (4)   The name and address of each person with a financial interest in the contractor and the percentage interest, except that if the contractor is a publicly-traded corporation, the contractor shall supply the names and addresses of the corporation's officers; (5)   The contractor's tax identification number and unemployment insurance registration number; (6)   A certification form provided by the commissioner, with documentation satisfactory to the commissioner, that the contractor has all valid and effective licenses, registrations or certificates required by State law, including registrations or certifications required to do business in the State of New Jersey, and  the contractor, if directly employing craftworkers, participates in a registered apprenticeship program as defined in section 3 of P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.50) for each craft they employ; and (7)   Any other relevant and appropriate information as determined by the commissioner. b.    At the time of registration, and subsequently upon request, the contractor shall submit to the commissioner documentation demonstrating that the contractor has worker's compensation insurance coverage for all workers as required by law. c.     A contractor that is licensed pursuant to P.L.1962, c.162 (C.45:5A-1 et seq. ), and section 7 of P.L.1997, c.305 (C.45:5A-27), or any person certified to operate as a fire protection contractor as defined by section 1 of P.L.2001, c.289 (C.52:27D-25n) that provides fire protection life safety systems, electronic security, including emerging technologies, or alarm installation services, which may include monitoring, repair, or other maintenance services, or a contractor that provides locksmith services, shall not be subject to the requirement to participate in any registered apprenticeship program pursuant to this section if the contractor is registering as a public works contractor under P.L.1999, c.238 (C.34:11-56.48 et seq.) to provide fire protection or life safety systems, electronic security, alarm installation services, or locksmith services in all public works projects.  Nothing in this section shall exempt a contractor that provides fire protection or life safety systems, electronic security, including emerging technologies, or  alarm installation services or a contractor that provides locksmith services from the requirement to participate in a registered apprenticeship program for other services pursuant to this section if the contractor performs public work for services that are unrelated to fire protection or life safety systems, electronic security, including emerging technologies, alarm installation services, or locksmith services. (cf: P.L.2019, c.21, s.2) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.